Alabama, session 2026rs, HB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 22-18-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§22-18-4
(a) In addition to all other fees now payable, the
Board of Healthdepartment shall establish, by rule, a fee for
EMSP and air or ground provider service licenses. Each license
issued to an EMSP shall be valid for a period of 24 calendar
months. Each license issued to a provider service shall be
valid for a period not to exceed 12 calendar months. The same
fee shall be charged for renewal of a license. No additional
fee shall be collected when an EMSP becomes eligible for
reclassification of his or her license to a higher level.
(b) All fees collected under this chapter shall be
retained in a separate fund by the Board of Healthdepartment
for the purpose of enforcing this chapter, and shall be
disbursed as other funds of the state are disbursed; provided,
that no fee or permit charge authorized under this chapter
Page 1

that no fee or permit charge authorized under this chapter
HB182 Enrolled
shall be charged or collected for the issuing of a permit to a
volunteer rescue squad, as defined in Section 32-11-1, for
providing ambulance service on a gratuitous basis, or any
member thereof who volunteers his or her service, unless
licensure is requested by the squad, company, or individual,
whereupon, a fee willshall be charged.
(c) Any person desiring EMSP licensure shall complete
an approved EMSP course as defined by rules of the Board of
Healthdepartment, successfully pass the appropriate level
licensure examination as determined by the Board of
Healthdepartment, and submit an application to the
boarddepartment. An approved EMSP course for any level shall
be a course conforming to the curriculum for that level as
approved by the United States Department of Transportation, or
approved by any other federal agency as, in the future, may
takehave jurisdiction over EMSP training curriculum
development. A curriculum may be required to be supplemented
with additional modules: (i) if the modules are optional
modules approved by the United States Department of
Transportation, or itsa successor as specified above,; and
(ii) the optional modules are prescribed, by rule, by the
boarddepartment pursuant to the Alabama Administrative
Procedure Act.
(d)(1) The department shall accept, upon satisfactory
presentation by the applicant, education, training, and
experience completed while a member of the Armed Forces or
Reserves of the United States or the National Guard, Military
Reserves, or Naval Militia of any state, and proof of
Page 2

Reserves, or Naval Militia of any state, and proof of
HB182 Enrolled
successful passage of the National Registry of Emergency
Medical Technicians examination as credit toward the
qualifications for EMSP licensure.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this
subsection.
(d)(e) No air or ground ambulance shall be operated for
ambulance purposes, and no individual shall fly, drive,
operate, attend, or permit the ambulance to be operated for
the purpose of transporting a patient from any point within
the State of Alabama to any other point within the State of
Alabama unless the ambulance is duly licensed by the Board of
Healthdepartment. The Board of Healthdepartment may prescribe
exceptions to this requirement consistent with the interests
of public health. Any ground ambulance shall at all times be
driven by a person holding a valid driver'sdriver license and
who has passed the Emergency Vehicle Operator Course approved
by the Board of Healthdepartment, the Apparatus Operator's
Course taught by the Alabama Fire College, or the Emergency
Vehicle Driver Course taught by the Alabama Fire College."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB182 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
100 was passed by the House 19-Feb-26.
101
102 John Treadwell
103 Clerk
104
105
106
107
108
109 Senate 26-Feb-26 Passed
110
111
112
Page 4